Hawaii statutes.
[PART
IV.] LIFE INSURANCE POLICY ILLUSTRATIONS

[§431:10D-401] Scope. This part shall
apply to all group and individual life insurance policies and certificates
except:

(1) Variable life insurance;

(2) Individual and group annuity contracts;

(3) Credit life insurance; and

(4) Life insurance policies with no illustrated death
benefits for any individual exceeding $10,000. [L 2000, c 252, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next